Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325F.7845] PHARMACEUTICAL ADVERTISING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Manufacturer" means a drug manufacturer licensed under section 151.252. new text end new text begin (c) "Prescription drug" has the meaning provided in section 151.441, subdivision 8. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin A manufacturer is prohibited from using televised advertisements to advertise the direct sale of prescription drugs to consumers. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin The attorney general may enforce this section under section 8.31. new text end